Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Department Functions.

Sec. 44.21.010.
Commissioner of administration.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Administration is the commissioner of administration.

History.

(§ 8 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d, Administrative Law, §§ 17 to 22.

73 C.J.S. Public Administrative Law and Procedure, §§ 15 to 25.

Sec. 44.21.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Administration shall

make surveys and studies to improve administrative procedures, methods, and organization;

keep general accounts;

approve vouchers and disburse funds for all purposes;

operate centralized purchasing and supply services, and necessary storerooms and warehouses;

allot space in state buildings to the various departments according to need and available space;

supervise telephone, mailing, messenger, duplicating, and similar services adaptable to centralized management;

administer the public employees’ retirement system and teachers’ retirement system;

administer a statewide personnel program, including central personnel services such as recruitment, assessment, position classification, and pay administration;

administer and supervise a statewide automatic data processing program;

study, design, implement, and manage the telecommunications systems and services of the state under AS

44.21.305

—

44.21.330

;

[Repealed, E.O. No. 120 § 2 (2021).]

History.

(§ 8 ch 64 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 30 (1968); am § 1 ch 170 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 97 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 40 § 6 (1979); am E.O. No. 50 § 7 (1981); am E.O. No. 78 § 2 (1991); am § 2 ch 98 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 91 § 3 (1995); am § 15 ch 111 SLA 2000; am E.O. No. 108 § 88 (2003); am E.O. No. 109 § 3 ch 109 (2003); am E.O. No. 120 § 3 (2021) SLA)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, the paragraphs in this section were renumbered to reflect the repeal of former paragraphs (9) and (12).

Administrative Code. —

For verification of electronic signatures, see 2 AAC 5, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective March 21, 2021, repealed (11).

Sec. 44.21.025.
Contracts to operate vending facilities in state buildings. [Repealed, § 62 ch 21 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 44.21.030.
Contracting with United States.

The Department of Administration may contract with the United States for the education, medical activities, agricultural assistance and social welfare, and relief of distress of Indians and Eskimos, and spend money appropriated by Congress for these activities in accordance with the provisions of the Act of Congress approved April 16, 1934.

History.

(§ 45-1-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 44.21.035.
State veterans’ home facilities. [Repealed, E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003).]

Sec. 44.21.040.
Records or accounts of claims and warrants.

The Department of Administration shall keep books of account in permanent form of the claims presented and of the disbursements made. These records must show

the name of the claimant;

the amount of the claim;

the date of its presentation;

the date of its allowance or disallowance;

the date and number of each disbursement made;

the name of the payee; and

the appropriation from which the disbursement is made.

The Department of Administration shall keep on file all original bills and claims presented, with the vouchers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 1953; am § 25 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Sec. 44.21.045.
Information services fund; charges.

The information services fund is established as an internal services fund in the Department of Administration. The fund consists of money appropriated to it, money transferred to the department by political subdivisions and state agencies as reimbursement for information services provided by the department, and the proceeds from the sale of surplus or other assets of the department used for information services.

Money transferred to the department by a political subdivision or state agency for information services for a fiscal year that exceeds the appropriation to the department for information services provided to the political subdivision or state agency for that fiscal year constitutes program receipts that are subject to the procedures of AS

37.07.080(h)

.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, money in the fund established under (a) of this section may be expended only in accordance with legislative appropriations. Money appropriated to the fund may be used for

the costs of the commissioner in carrying out the commissioner’s duties under AS

44.21.350

—

44.21.390

, including the costs of performing reviews and studies considered necessary by the commissioner under AS

44.21.350

;

necessary expenses of providing information services to political subdivisions and state agencies;

additions, replacements, or improvement of capital equipment for information services; requests by the department for capital equipment expenditures shall be included in the budget submitted by the governor to the legislature under AS 37.07; and

other purposes as specified in an appropriation to the fund.

The department may charge and collect fees and surcharges for information services provided by it to agencies and political subdivisions of the state. The department shall maintain cost accounting records to support rates and billings for information services provided by the department. The department shall submit a report on the operation of the fund to the governor at the time of submission of the departmental budget and notify the legislature that the report is available.

A state agency that receives information services from the department shall include in its annual budget, as an identifiable item, its expected fees and surcharges for information services provided by the Department of Administration.

Fees and surcharges for information services of the department are subject to annual review and approval by the commissioner of the department.

In this section, “information services” includes automatic data processing services provided under AS

44.21.150

—

44.21.170

and telecommunications services and operations described in AS

44.21.305

—

44.21.330

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 156 SLA 1990; am § 87 ch 21 SLA 1995; am E.O. No. 113 §§ 6, 7 (2005))

Sec. 44.21.050.
Penalty for allowance of false, unjust or illegal claims. [Repealed, § 4 ch 51 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 44.21.060.
Recording. [Repealed, E.O.
No. 40, § 6 (1979).]

Secs. 44.21.100 — 44.21.130.
Pioneers’ Home Advisory Board. [Repealed, E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003). For current law, see AS 44.29.500 — 44.29.530.]